Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 3. Air Emissions Control.

§§ 10.1-1327,
10.1-1328.
Repealed by Acts 2011, c. 291, cl. 1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, c. 291, cl. 1 provides: “That §§

10.1-1327

and 10.1-1328 of the Code of Virginia, and any regulations implementing the Clean Air Interstate Rule, shall be repealed upon the earlier of (i) the date when facilities in the Commonwealth become subject to the requirements of a federal implementation plan adopted by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency in response to the remand of the Clean Air Interstate Rule, or (ii) the effective date of a final rule adopted by the State Air Pollution Control Board implementing federal requirements adopted by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency in response to the remand of the Clean Air Interstate Rule.” At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission the repeal has been give effect. The repeal became effective on January 1, 2015, following the lifting of a stay on the implementation of the Cross State Air Pollution Rule (SCAPR) by the United States Court of Appeals District of Columbia Circuit. The CSAPR superseded the Clean Air Interstate Rule. Elements of Virginia’s implementation plan remain in litigation.

Former
§§

10.1-1327

and 10.1-1328, pertaining to
Air Emissions Control, derived from Acts 2006, cc. 867, 920; 2010, cc. 783, 867.